Tennessee, session 114, HB2362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1008, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, a governmental entity that regulates
entertainment transportation pursuant to this part shall not:
(1) Refuse to renew a permit to a business that provides entertainment
transportation if the governmental entity issued the initial permit to a business to
provide entertainment transportation;
(2) Revoke a permit issued to a business that provides entertainment
transportation except for good cause shown in an administrative hearing;
(3) Deny the transfer of a permit or any other regulatory credentials
issued by the governmental entity for purposes of operating an entertainment
transportation vehicle from one business that provides entertainment
transportation to another:
(A) If the business receiving the permit or regulatory credentials
demonstrates the ability to operate an entertainment transportation
vehicle that is qualified under state law or local ordinance, resolution, rule,
or regulation to operate in the jurisdiction of the governmental entity for
which it was issued; and
(B) If notice of the transfer is provided to the permitting authority
designated by the governmental entity;
HB2362
012310
- 1 -

(4) Prohibit the holder of a permit or any other regulatory credentials
issued by a governmental entity for the purposes of operating an entertainment
transportation vehicle from entering into a partnership with another business:
(A) If all parties are otherwise qualified under state law or local
ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation to operate in the jurisdiction of
the governmental entity for which it was issued; and
(B) If notice of the partnership is provided to the permitting
authority designated by the governmental entity;
(5) Establish noise ordinances for entertainment transportation vehicles
that create different maximum allowable decibel limits from other commercial
property within a commercial zoning area designed for tourism activity;
(6) Require an applicant for permit or other regulatory credentials to
submit a traffic study as a condition of approval; or
(7) Require entertainment transportation vehicles to be enclosed if all
other safety requirements established by state law or local ordinance, resolution,
rule, or regulation are met.
(b) As used in this section, "good cause":
(1) Means a repeated, material violation of a state law or a local
ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation governing the permit, which may be
demonstrated by a knowing failure or refusal to comply with such law, ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation; and
(2) Includes the disuse or dormancy of a permit for a period of six (6)
months or longer prior to the governmental entity taking action to revoke the
permit; provided, that the start date for calculating a six-month period of disuse or
dormancy begins on or after May 1, 2024.
- 2 - 012310

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012310